Utah statutes.
79-5-503.   Bonneville Shoreline Trail Program.

(1)  There is created the Bonneville Shoreline Trail Program.

(2)  The program shall be funded from the following sources:

(a)  appropriations made to the program by the Legislature; and

(b)  contributions from other public and private sources.

(3)  All money appropriated to the Bonneville Shoreline Trail Program is nonlapsing.

(4)  The Bonneville Shoreline Trail is intended to:

(a)  follow on or near the old Lake Bonneville shoreline terrace near the foot of the Wasatch Mountains from Juab County through Cache County; and

(b)  provide continuous and safe trails.

(5) (a)  The program money shall be used to provide grants to local governments for the planning, development, and construction of the Bonneville Shoreline Trail.

(b)  Grant recipients shall provide matching funds in accordance with Section 79-5-501.

